Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-235
Powers granted counties.

The powers herein granted to all municipalities are specifically declared to be granted to counties in this state, any other statute to the contrary notwithstanding.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 13(2), p. 169.